Maryland, session 2025, SB0969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
7–405.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE HOWARD COUNTY
DEPARTMENT OF FIRE AND RESCUE SERVICES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT FAIL OR REFUSE TO HIRE, DISCHARGE, OR
OTHERWISE DISCRIMINATE AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL WITH RESPECT TO THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0969*

SENATE BILL 969
INDIVIDUAL’S COMPENSATION, TERMS, CONDITIONS, OR PRIVILEGES OF
EMPLOYMENT SOLELY BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
(1) A QUALIFYING PATIENT UNDER TITLE 36, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) AUTHORIZED TO USE MEDICAL CANNABIS UNDER THE LAWS OF
ANOTHER STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROHIBIT AN EMPLOYEE FROM:
(1) PERFORMING THE EMPLOYEE’S DUTIES WHILE IMPAIRED BY
CANNABIS; OR
(2) USING CANNABIS WITHIN THE 12 HOURS IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE EMPLOYEE’S SHIFT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.